Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1626
Collection of fees.

Any person who unreasonably fails or refuses to pay any fee due under the Propane Education and Research Act may be subject to legal action by the council to recover the fees due, plus interest and costs.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 26.